Maryland, session 2025, HB0395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
14–419.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “OPIOID OVERDOSE REVERSAL DRUG” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 13–3501 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
BEGINNING JULY 1, 2025, STATE FUNDS MAY NOT BE USED TO PURCHASE OPIOID
OVERDOSE REVERSAL DRUGS FROM A PERSON THAT WAS PARTY TO A SETTLEMENT
WITH ANY STATE DUE TO ITS ROLE IN THE MANUFACTURE, SALE, OR DISTRIBUTION
OF PRESCRIPTION OPIOIDS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0395*

HOUSE BILL 395
(2) THE PROHIBITION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(I) A PERSON THAT AGREED UNDER THE TERMS OF A
SETTLEMENT WITH ANY STATE, EXECUTED ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2024, TO
PROVIDE OPIOID OVERDOSE REVERSAL DRUGS AS PART OF THE SETTLEMENT UNTIL
THE TERMS OF A SETTLEMENT WITH ANY STATE ARE FULFILLED; OR
(II) A PERSON WITH A STATE CONTRACT TO PROVIDE OPIOID
OVERDOSE REVERSAL DRUGS TO THE STATE EXECUTED ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30,
2025, UNTIL THE FULFILLMENT OF THE TERMS OF THE STATE CONTRACT.
(C) A STATE CONTRACT DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2)(II) OF THIS
SECTION MAY NOT BE RENEWED ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2025.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That a presently existing obligation
or contract right may not be impaired in any way by this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.